Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 18 Child Maltreatment Act
12-18-602. Initiation of the investigation.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall cause an investigation to be made upon receiving initial notification of suspected child maltreatment or notification of a child death.

(1)All investigations shall begin within seventy-two (72) hours.

However, the investigation shall begin within twenty-four (24) hours if:

Develop policy and procedures to follow when a child dies suddenly and unexpectedly to use in a child death investigation;

Determine during the Department of Human Services’ and the Division of Arkansas State Police’s investigation whether the child's death was caused by child maltreatment; and

Assess the home to ensure the safety of surviving siblings or children in the home.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 11; 2015, No. 1004, § 11; 2015, No. 1026, § 5; 2015, No. 1211, § 4; 2017, No. 250, § 13; 2019, No. 881, § 2.

12-18-603. Accompaniment by law enforcement.

Upon request, law enforcement shall accompany a person conducting an investigation required by this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-604. Services during the investigation.

The Department of Human Services may make referrals or provide services during the course of the child maltreatment investigation.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1090, § 1; 2015, No. 1161, §
2.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The amendments to this section by Acts 2015, No. 1004, § 12, were incorporated into §12-18-622.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (b).

The 2015 amendment removed the (a) designation and substituted “may” for “shall have the authority to”; and deleted (b) (see now §12-18-622).

12-18-605. Investigative interviews.

An investigation of child maltreatment or suspected child maltreatment under this chapter shall include interviews with:

The child as provided under § 12-18-608;

The parents, both custodial and noncustodial;

If neither parent is the alleged offender, the alleged offender;

Current or past healthcare providers when the allegation of child maltreatment was reported by a healthcare provider; and

Any other relevant persons.

If, after exercising reasonable diligence in conducting any or all interviews, the subjects of the interviews cannot be located or are unable to communicate, the efforts to conduct the interviews shall be documented and the investigation shall proceed under this chapter.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “§12-18-608” for “subsection (b) of this section” in (a)(1).

The 2015 amendment inserted present (a)(4); and redesignated former (a)(4) as (a)(5).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 12; 2015, No. 1123, § 1.

12-18-606. When the alleged offender is a family member, a fictive kin, or lives in the home with the alleged victim.

If the alleged offender is a family member, fictive kin, or lives in the home with the alleged victim, an investigation under this chapter shall seek to ascertain:

The existence, cause, nature, and extent of the child maltreatment;

The existence and extent of previous injuries;

The identity of the person responsible for the child maltreatment;

The names and conditions of other children in the home;

The circumstances of the parents or caretakers of the child;

The environment where the child resides;

The relationship of the child or children with the parents or caretakers; and

All other pertinent data.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “a fictive kin” in the section heading and made a similar change in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2019, No. 881, § 3.

12-18-607. When the alleged offender is neither a family member nor a fictive kin and not living in the home with the alleged victim.

If the alleged offender is not a family member living in the home with the alleged victim, the investigation under this chapter shall seek to ascertain:

The existence, cause, nature, and extent of child maltreatment;

The identity of the person responsible for the child maltreatment;

The existence and extent of previous child maltreatment perpetrated by the alleged offender;

If the report is determined to be true, the names and conditions of any children of the alleged offender and whether these children have been maltreated or are at risk of child maltreatment unless the investigating agency has determined that there is no indication of risk to the children;

If the report is determined to be true and is a report of sexual abuse, sexual contact, or sexual exploitation, an assessment of any other children previously or currently under the care of the alleged offender, to the extent practical, and whether these children have been maltreated or are at risk of maltreatment unless the investigating agency has determined that there is no indication of risk to the children; and

All other pertinent and relevant data.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted “If the report is determined to be true” from the beginning of (4).

The 2015 amendment added “If the report is determined to be true” in (4).

The 2019 amendment substituted “neither a family member nor a fictive kin and” for “not a family member or” in the section heading; deleted “nor” following “family member” in the introductory language; and added “unless the investigating agency has determined that there is no indication of risk to the children” at the end of (4) and (5).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 13; 2015, No. 1026, § 6; 2019, No. 881, § 4.

12-18-608. Interview of the alleged child victim, siblings of a child victim, or any other children in the home or under the care of an alleged offender.

A person conducting an interview with a child victim, sibling of a child victim, or any other children in the home or under the care of an alleged offender shall have the discretion:

In the child's best interest, to limit the persons allowed to be present when a child is being interviewed concerning allegations of child maltreatment; and

As it relates to the integrity of the investigation, to limit persons present during an interview.

The interview with the child victim, siblings of a child victim, or any other children in the home or under the care of an alleged offender shall be conducted separate and apart from the alleged offender or any representative or attorney for the alleged offender.

However, if the age or abilities of the child victim render an interview impossible, the investigation shall include observation of the child.

If a person conducting an investigation under this chapter is denied access to a child as permitted under this section, the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police may petition the proper juvenile division of a circuit court for an ex parte order of investigation to limit the persons allowed to be present when the child is being interviewed.

However, upon application to the circuit court and a showing of good cause by a parent, caretaker, or person denying unrestricted access to a child, the circuit court may issue a written order to stay the order of investigation pending a hearing to be held within seventy-two (72) hours.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “siblings of a child victim, or any other children in the home or under the care of an alleged offender” three times in the section and substituted “interview with” for “investigation of” in (a).

The 2015 amendment added (c).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (c)(1).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (b).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 14; 2015, No. 1026, § 7.

12-18-609. Right to enter for the purposes of the investigation.

A person conducting an investigation under this chapter shall have the right to enter into or upon a home, school, or any other place for the purpose of conducting the investigation and interviewing or completing the investigation.

(1)A publicly supported school, facility, or institution shall not deny access to any person conducting a child maltreatment investigation under this chapter.

Failure to comply with this section may subject the publicly supported school, facility, or institution to a contempt sanction and reimbursement of attorney's fees.

(1)If necessary access or admission is denied to a person conducting an investigation under this chapter, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may petition the proper juvenile division of circuit court for an ex parte order of investigation requiring the parent, caretaker, or persons denying access to any place where the child may be to allow entrance for the interviews, examinations, and investigations.

However, upon application to the court by the parents, caretaker, or persons denying access to the child showing good cause, the court may issue a written order to stay the order of investigation pending a hearing to be held within seventy-two (72) hours.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 13.

12-18-610. Access to the child's school records.

A person conducting an investigation under this chapter shall be allowed access to the child's public and private school records during the course of the child maltreatment investigation.

Upon request, a public or private school shall provide the child's records free of charge to the person conducting the investigation.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 12.

12-18-611. Inspection of personnel and volunteer records.

A person conducting an investigation required by this chapter shall have the right to inspect personnel records of employees and volunteers in any place where an allegation of child maltreatment has been reported as having occurred at that place but the alleged offender is unknown.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-612. Criminal background check.

The person conducting an investigation under this chapter shall have the right to obtain a criminal background check, including a fingerprint-based check in any national crime information database, on any subject of the report.

The results of the criminal background check shall not be disclosed outside of the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police except as permitted under this chapter.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 14.

12-18-613. Access to miscellaneous records.

Upon request by a person conducting an investigation under this chapter, a school, day care center, child care facility, residential facility, residential treatment facility, or similar institution shall provide the person conducting the investigation with:

The name, date of birth, Social Security number, and last known address and phone number of any person identified as an alleged offender if the alleged child maltreatment occurred at that school, center, or facility; and

The name and address of any witness to the alleged child maltreatment if the alleged child maltreatment occurred at that school, center, or facility.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-614. Submission to a physical exam or other testing.

An investigation under this chapter may include a physical examination, a drug test, radiology procedures, photographs, and a psychological or psychiatric examination of all children subject to the care, custody, or control of the alleged offender.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-615. Radiology procedures, photographs, electronic media, and medical records.

A person who is required to make a report under this chapter may take or cause to be taken radiology procedures and photographs or compile medical records that may be relevant as to the existence or extent of child maltreatment.

A hospital, clinic, or child safety center, or the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may make electronic media that may be relevant as to the existence or extent of child maltreatment.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police, or law enforcement officials shall be provided at no cost a copy of the results of radiology procedures, electronic media, photographs, or medical records upon request.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “electronic media” for “videotapes” throughout and substituted “child safety center, or the Department of Human Services” for “or” in (b).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b) and (c).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “forty-five (45) days” for “thirty (30) days” in (a)(1); added (a)(3); deleted former (b); and redesignated former (c) as (b).

The 2015 amendment substituted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” for “the Crimes Against Children Division of the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1).

Any legal remedies, including the authority to initiate legal proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction; and

Medical care or treatment for a child when such care or treatment is necessary to prevent or remedy serious harm to the child or to prevent the withholding of medically indicated treatment from a child with life-threatening conditions.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 15; 2015, No. 1004, § 15.

12-18-616. Timing.

(1)Except as otherwise provided in this section, an investigative determination shall be made in each investigation under this chapter within forty-five (45) days regardless of whether the investigation is conducted by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police, or local law enforcement.

However, this procedural requirement shall not be considered as a factor to alter the investigative determination in any judicial or administrative proceeding.

(A)An extension of an additional fifteen (15) days to make an investigative determination is permitted.

The Department of Human Services and the Crimes Against Children Division of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall respectively promulgate rules pertaining to the extension of time to make an investigative determination.

An investigation shall not be transferred to inactive status because an investigator is awaiting documentary evidence.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 426, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 16.

12-18-617. Authority to pursue other remedies.

Notwithstanding an investigative determination finding of true but exempted, the Department of Human Services may pursue:

Except with respect to the withholding of medically indicated treatments from a disabled infant with life-threatening conditions, case-by-case determinations concerning the exercise of authority in this section shall be within the sole discretion of the department.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-618. Religious bias prohibited.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall investigate all allegations of child maltreatment without regard to the parent's practice of his or her religious beliefs and shall only consider whether the acts or omissions of the parent constitute child maltreatment under this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 17.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police”.

12-18-619. Closing investigations.

If at any time before or during an investigation under this chapter it is determined that the alleged offender is not a caretaker of any child and the alleged victim has reached eighteen (18) years of age prior to notification, the child maltreatment investigation shall be closed notwithstanding any criminal investigation.

If at any time before or during the investigation it appears that the alleged offender is identified and is not a caretaker of the victim child, excluding investigations of sexual abuse, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall:

Refer the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency;

Close their investigation; and

Forward a copy of their findings to the appropriate law enforcement agency for the agency's further use in any criminal investigation.

If the appropriate law enforcement agency subsequently determines that the alleged offender is a caretaker, it shall immediately notify the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police of its determination.

Thereupon the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall reopen and continue their investigation in compliance with all other requirements contained in this chapter.

If at any time before or during the investigation the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police are unable to locate or identify the alleged offender because the alleged child maltreatment occurred more than five (5) years ago or in another state, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall consider the report unable to be completed and place the report in inactive status.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1).

The department may provide information, including protected health information, to a person or agency that provides services such as medical examination of, an assessment interview with, or diagnosis of, care for, treatment of, or supervision of a victim of child maltreatment, a juvenile offender, or an underaged juvenile offender.

Information on a pending investigation, including protected health information, shall be released upon request to:

The department, excluding pending investigations on an employee or spouse of the Division of Children and Family Services;

Law enforcement;

The prosecuting attorney;

The responsible multidisciplinary team;

The attorney ad litem of the alleged victim or offender;

A court-appointed special advocate volunteer for the alleged victim or offender;

Any licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities;

Any department division director or facility director receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report pursuant to this chapter;

Any facility director receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report pursuant to this chapter;

Any family advocacy program or other person designated by the military authority for the military installation receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under § 12-18-508;

Federal, state, and local government entities, or any agent of such entities, that have a need for such information to carry out their responsibilities under law to protect children from child maltreatment.

Acting in their official capacities under law to protect children, disclosure may be made to individual United States and Arkansas senators and representatives and their authorized staff members, but only if they agree not to permit any redisclosure of the information except for a legitimate state purpose to protect children from child maltreatment.

However, disclosure shall not be made to any committee or legislative body;

The attorney ad litem and court-appointed special advocate of a juvenile who has an open dependency-neglect case, if the alleged offender or the minor victim resides in the home or in the proposed placement location for the juvenile that is not a licensed foster home, adoptive home, shelter, or facility; and

A Child Welfare Ombudsman.

Information on a pending investigation, including protected health information, may be released to or disclosed in a circuit court child custody case or similar case if:

No seventy-two-hour hold has been exercised under this chapter or pleadings filed pursuant to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.;

Written notice of intent to request release or disclosure is provided to the investigating agency at least five (5) days before the date for release or disclosure;

The investigating agency has the opportunity to appear before the court and be heard on the issue of release or disclosure;

The information gathered by the investigative agency is necessary for the determination of an issue before the court;

Waiting until completion of the investigation will jeopardize the health or safety of the child in the custody case;

A protective order is issued to prevent redisclosure of the information provided by the investigating agency or the information is released or disclosed only to the court in camera; and

Release or disclosure of the information will not compromise a criminal investigation.

Information on a pending investigation, including protected health information, may be released to or disclosed in the circuit court if the victim or alleged offender has an open dependency-neglect or family in need of services case before the circuit court.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 945, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission to provide for independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas”.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “responsible” for “appropriate” in (e)(4).

The 2015 amendment added “excluding . . . Department of Human Services” in (e)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 250, in (d), inserted “child” preceding “maltreatment” and substituted “offender” for “aggressor” at the end.

The 2017 amendment by No. 528 inserted (e)(10); and redesignated former (e)(10) as (e)(11).

The 2017 amendment by No. 713 redesignated (e)(10)(A) as (e)(10)(A)(i) [now (e)(11)(A)(i)]; and added (e)(10)(A)(ii) [now (e)(11)(A)(ii)].

The 2017 amendment by No. 803 added (e)(11) [now (e)(12)].

The 2019 amendment by No. 590 rewrote (e)(11).

The 2019 amendment by No. 945 added (e)(13).

Cross References. Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq.

Records showing the nature and extent of the child's present and past injuries;

Records showing previous injuries or child maltreatment of the child or his or her siblings;

School records, as described under § 12-18-610;

Personnel and volunteer records, as described under § 12-18-611; and

Results of radiological procedures, photographs, or medical records, as described under § 12-18-615.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by No. 1004 inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” twice.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning no merit investigations, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 802, § 4, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 2015, No. 1212, § 1; 2017, No. 250, § 15.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 945, § 11: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some juveniles in Arkansas may be unaware of their rights under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that some individuals and entities that are responsible for the welfare of a juvenile may be unaware of the rights of the juvenile under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that the creation of the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission will help increase awareness of a juvenile's legal rights; that independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas is more than likely to result in recommendations that will further improve the procedures and operations of the child welfare system; and that this act is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

The name and address of the person responsible for the injuries or child maltreatment, if known;

Services offered and accepted;

Family composition;

The source of the notification; and

The person making the notification, his or her occupation, and where he or she can be reached.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “at the conclusion of the investigation” for “of the investigation by the conclusion of a period of thirty (30) days” in (a).

Although admission of portions of an investigator's report to the prosecutor were hearsay and were admitted in error, the child's grandmother failed to show prejudice because the trial court's ruling showed that it relied on the child's statements in a recorded interview in determining that she was dependent neglected on the basis of sexual abuse. The DVD of the interview was entered into evidence independently and constituted sufficient evidence to support the dependency neglect adjudication without any reference to the prosecuting attorney's report.Berthelot v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2012 Ark. App. 249, 413 S.W.3d 536 (2012).

An unsubstantiated determination shall be entered when the allegation is not supported by a preponderance of the evidence;

(A)True.

A true determination shall be entered when the allegation is supported by a preponderance of the evidence;

(A)True but exempted.

A determination of true but exempted is a true determination where the offender's name shall not be placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, shall be entered if:

A parent practicing his or her religious beliefs does not, for that reason alone, provide medical treatment for a child, but in lieu of treatment the child is being furnished with treatment by spiritual means alone, through prayer, in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing by an accredited practitioner;

The offender is an underaged juvenile offender;

The report was true for neglect as defined under § 12-18-103(14)(B); or

The offender is a juvenile less than fourteen (14) years of age at the time of the offense; or

If the investigation cannot be completed, the investigation shall be determined incomplete and placed in inactive status.

An investigation of a report of child maltreatment that is closed under § 12-18-601 shall be documented as administratively closed without a determination of whether the allegation is unsubstantiated, true, true but exempt, or inactive.

(1)If the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police determines that a report of child maltreatment is true, the Department of Human Services shall determine whether the offender may pose a risk of maltreatment to a vulnerable population, including without limitation children, the elderly, persons with a disability, and persons with a mental health illness.

The procedures of the Department of Human Services shall require the following factors to be considered in the determination of whether an offender may pose a risk of maltreatment to a vulnerable population:

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 802, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)All members of society desire the safety of all children;

“(2)A child raised under constant adult supervision may miss opportunities for growth that will negatively impact his or her mental and physical development;

“(3)The alarming rise of childhood obesity and diabetes is almost certainly linked to an increase in the sedentary lifestyle and lack of physical activity for children today, which is often encouraged by parents and guardians, including without limitation by insisting on driving their children to school;

“(4)As measured by incidences of mental health difficulties, the over-supervised youth of today experience more difficulties when they reach adulthood than earlier generations;

“(5)Earlier generations learned resilience by walking, bicycling, playing, helping, and solving problems without constant adult intervention;

“(6)Parents and guardians are often in the best position to weigh the risk and make decisions concerning the safety of children under their care, including without limitation where their child may go, with whom, and when; and

“(7)Parents and guardians who have done nothing more than briefly and safely permitted their children to remain unsupervised should not be subject to investigation and possible prosecution as it causes unnecessary governmental intrusion and diversion of valuable public resources.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act:

“(1)Protect and promote the inherent right of a parent or guardian to raise his or her children;

“(2)Protect the decision of a parent or a guardian to grant his or her children unsupervised time to engage in activities that include without limitation playing outside, walking to school, bicycling, remaining briefly in a vehicle, and remaining at home; and

“(3)Ensure that valuable public resources are used most effectively to protect children by providing a secondary review to ensure that:

“(A)Calls to the Child Abuse Hotline are properly accepted;

“(B)Child maltreatment investigations are closed when the results of the investigation indicate that the allegations lack merit; and

“(C)Only the names of offenders who pose a risk to a vulnerable population are placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “offender” for “aggressor” in (2)(C)(ii); and added (2)(C)(iv).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (2)(C)(iv).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in the introductory language.

The 2019 amendment added (b) and (c) and designated the former section as (a); added (a)(3)(A); redesignated former (a)(2)(C) as (a)(3)(B); substituted “is a true determination where” for “which means that” in (a)(3)(B); inserted “at the time of the offense” in (a)(3)(B)(iv); and redesignated former (a)(3)(A) and (a)(3)(B) as (a)(4)(A) and (a)(4)(B).

The severity of the child maltreatment;

The nature and severity of an injury or other adverse impact caused by the child maltreatment;

The access the offender has to a vulnerable population;

Any previous substantiated child maltreatment findings against the offender;

A subsequent report of child maltreatment alleged against the offender; and

The criminal history of the offender.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall notify each alleged offender of the child maltreatment investigative determination whether true or unsubstantiated.

(1)In every case in which a report is determined to be true, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall notify the alleged offender of the investigative determination by certified mail, restricted delivery, or by process server as permitted under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

(1)The notice of the investigative determination shall include a statement that the request for an administrative hearing shall be made within thirty (30) days of the receipt of notice under subsection (b) of this section.

The allegations are determined to be true; and

The alleged offender's name is exempt from placement in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (b)(2).

The 2013 amendment added (c).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1004 inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1097 substituted “or by process server as permitted under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure” for “or process server” in (b)(1).

Although appellant did not receive timely notice of the true finding of abuse and an opportunity to be heard before his name was placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, appellant's due process argument was not preserved for appeal as he failed to raise it before the ALJ or the circuit court.Smith v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2018 Ark. App. 438, 559 S.W.3d 291 (2018).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 18.

12-18-620. Release of information on pending investigation.

Information on a pending investigation under this chapter is confidential and may be disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

(1)The Department of Human Services shall not release data that would identify a person who made a report under this chapter unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found it has reason to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report.

However, upon request, the information shall be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement.

(1)Any person or agency to whom disclosure is made shall not disclose to any other person any information obtained pursuant to this section.

However, the person or agency is permitted to consult his or her or its own attorney regarding the information in any notice provided by the department.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 13; 2015, No. 1026, § 8; 2017, No. 250, § 14; 2017, No. 528, § 2; 2017, No. 713, § 5; 2017, No. 803, § 2; 2019, No. 590, § 1; 2019, No. 945, § 6.

12-18-621. Right to obtain records during course of the investigation.

Upon a request by a person conducting an investigation under this chapter, the keeper of the record shall provide the person conducting the investigation with the following:

(1)If a person conducting an investigation under this chapter is denied records authorized to be released under subsection (a) of this section, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may petition the proper juvenile division of circuit court for an ex parte order of investigation to obtain the records.

However, upon application to the circuit court and a showing of good cause by the keeper of the record, the circuit court may issue a written order to stay the order to tender records pending a hearing to be held within seventy-two (72) hours.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1026, § 9.

12-18-622. Access to the controlled substance database.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may petition a circuit court to allow an investigator to access the controlled substance database under the Prescription Drug Monitoring Program Act, §20-7-601 et seq., for a record concerning a person.

The circuit court may grant a petition under this section if the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police demonstrate probable cause that:

The person was or is in possession of one (1) or more prescription drugs;

The person gave birth to a baby; and

The person or the baby tested positive for one (1) or more prescription drugs at the time of the birth of the baby.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1161, § 3; 2015, No. 1004, §
12.

12-18-623. [Repealed.]

12-18-701. Generally.

The agency responsible for an investigation under this chapter shall make a complete written report at the conclusion of the investigation.

The report of the investigation shall include the following information:

The names and addresses of the child and his or her legal parents and other caretakers of the child, if known;

The child's age, sex, and race;

The nature and extent of the child's present and past injuries;

The investigative determination;

The nature and extent of the child maltreatment, including any evidence of previous injuries or child maltreatment to the child or his or her siblings;

The agency responsible for the investigation shall immediately provide the Department of Human Services at no cost a copy of the written report and any information gathered during the course of the investigation, including statements from witnesses and transcripts of interviews.

All information gathered during the course of the investigation shall be contained in the file of the department whether or not the information supports the investigative determination.

(1)The department shall not release data that would identify the person who made the report unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found it has reason to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report.

However, the information shall be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement officers on request.

The report, exclusive of information identifying the person making the notification, shall be admissible in evidence in any proceeding related to child maltreatment.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Arkansas Rules of Evidence, any privilege between a minister and any person confessing to or being counseled by the minister shall not constitute grounds for excluding evidence at any dependency-neglect proceeding or proceedings involving custody of a child.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1026, § 10.

12-18-702. Investigative determination.

Upon completion of an investigation under this chapter, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall determine whether the allegations of child maltreatment are:

(A)Unsubstantiated.

(A)Inactive.

(A)The Department of Human Services shall establish procedures to determine the risk level of the offender and any vulnerable population to which the offender may pose a risk of maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 14; 2013, No. 1006, § 16; 2015, No. 1004, § 19; 2019, No. 802, § 5.

12-18-703. Notice generally.

Failure of service under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is not deemed failure of notice if the alleged offender has actual notice.

An alleged offender is not entitled to an automatic administrative hearing if:

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 15; 2013, No. 1006, § 17; 2015, No. 1004, § 20; 2015, No. 1097, § 1.

12-18-704. Notice if the investigative determination is true but exempted and the alleged offender is a child.

If the investigative determination of the report was determined true but exempted under §12-18-702(2)(C)(ii) and the alleged offender is a child at the time the act or omission occurred, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall notify the legal parents and legal guardians of the investigative determination and that the child's name shall not be placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, and the alleged offender may petition for an administrative hearing.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 15; 2013, No. 1006, § 18; 2015, No. 1004, § 21.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “investigative determination of the” and “but exempted under §12-18-702(2)(C)(ii) or §12-18-702(2)(C)(iv)” and deleted “under ten (10) years of age” following “is a child”.

The 2013 amendment deleted “or §12-18-702(2)(C)(iv)” following “§12-18-702(2)(C)(ii)” and added “and the alleged offender may petition for an administrative hearing” to the end.

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police”.